Utah statutes.
3-1-14.   Removal of director.
Any member may ask for the removal of a director by filing charges with the
secretary or president of the association, together with a petition signed by
ten per centum of the members requesting the removal of the director in
question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next meeting of the members,
and the association may remove the director by a majority vote of the members
voting thereon. The director whose removal is requested shall be served with a
copy of the charges not less than ten days prior to the meeting and shall have
an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person and by counsel and to
present evidence; and the persons requesting the removal shall have the same
opportunity. In case the bylaws provide for election of directors by
districts, then the petition for removal of a director must be signed by
twenty per centum of the members residing in the district from which he was
elected. The board must call a special meeting of the members residing in that
district to consider the removal of the director; and by a majority vote of
the members of that district voting thereon the director in question shall be
removed from office.
